Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,226
Exception to notice requirements.

(MBCA 16.06) (a) Whenever
notice would otherwise be required to be given under any provision of the
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act to a shareholder, such notice need
not be given if:

(1) Notices to shareholders
of two consecutive annual meetings and all notices of meetings during the
period between such two consecutive annual meetings have been sent to such
shareholder at such shareholder's address as shown on the records of the corporation
and have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered; or

(2) All, but not less than
two, payments of dividends on securities during a twelve-month period, or
two consecutive payments of dividends on securities during a period of more
than twelve months, have been sent to such shareholder at such shareholder's
address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned
undeliverable or could not be delivered.

(b) If any such shareholder shall deliver to the corporation
a written notice setting forth such shareholder's then-current address, the
requirement that notice be given to such shareholder shall be reinstated.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 226.
January 1, 2017